Maine, session 132, LD1480.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §8702, as amended by PL 1995, c. 402, Pt. A, §47; repealed
and replaced by PL 1995, c. 505, §5 and affected by §22; and amended by PL 2003, c. 545,
§4, is further amended to read:
§8702. Curriculum
A driver education course offered in accordance with section 8701 must meet the
curriculum requirements prescribed by the Secretary of State,; include both classroom
instruction and practice driving, except that an adult education program may offer a driver
education course that includes only classroom instruction for the purpose of issuing a
learner's permit under Title 29-A, section 1304, subsection 1-C; and be approved by the
Secretary of State. Any state subsidy, state reimbursement for expenditures on adult
education programs or state reimbursement for adult career and technical education
programs may not be paid with respect to any driver education course that has not been
approved by the Secretary of State.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1304, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. Notwithstanding paragraph A, a person who is 15 1/2 years of age or older, has
not attained 18 years of age, has not completed a course in driver education and has
successfully passed all parts of an examination other than the driving test may apply
for a learner's permit pursuant to subsection 1-B.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1304, sub-§1, ¶J is enacted to read:
J. A person who is at least 18 years of age may apply for a learner's permit or be issued
a learner's permit through an adult education program pursuant to subsection 1-C.
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §1304, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Learner's permit; exception to driver education for issuance.
Notwithstanding subsection 1, paragraphs A, B and E, a person who is 15 1/2 years of age
or older, has not attained 18 years of age, has successfully passed all parts of an examination
other than the driving test and has not completed a course in driver education may apply
for a learner's permit for the purposes of learning how to drive as long as the requirements
of this subsection are met.
A. Unless the permittee is operating a motorcycle or moped, the learner's permit
requires the permittee to be accompanied by a licensed operator who:
(1) Is a parent or guardian of the permittee or another responsible adult;
(2) Has held a valid license for at least 2 years;
(3) Is at least 25 years of age;
(4) Is occupying a seat beside the driver; and
(5) Is licensed to operate the class vehicle operated by the permittee.
The accompanying operator must adhere to all restrictions applied to the license when
functioning as the permittee's accompanying operator.
B. The licensed operator accompanying the permittee pursuant to paragraph A is liable
for any violation of this Title by the permittee.
Page 1 - 132LR1373(01)

Sec. 5. 29-A MRSA §1304, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. Learner's permit; exception to driver education for issuance to adults. A
person who is at least 18 years of age may apply for a learner's permit for the purposes of
learning how to drive if:
A. The person has successfully passed all parts of an examination other than the driving
test; or
B. The person has successfully completed a driver education course that includes only
classroom instruction through an adult education program and has been issued a
completion certificate under section 1351, subsection 3.
Notwithstanding paragraph B, a driver education course that includes only classroom
instruction through an adult education program may issue a learner's permit pursuant to
subsection 1-A, paragraph D if the person being issued the learner's permit is at least 18
years of age and has successfully completed the course.
Sec. 6. 29-A MRSA §1351, sub-§2, as amended by PL 1997, c. 393, Pt. A, §35
and affected by §37 and amended by PL 2003, c. 545, §5, is further amended to read:
2. Approved course. An approved driver education course is a course given by a:
A. Public A public secondary school;
B. Private A private secondary school approved for attendance purposes by the
Commissioner of Education;
C. Career A career and technical education center or a career and technical education
region; or
C-1. An adult education program; or
D. Person A person licensed by the Secretary of State.